California statutes. Penal Code
(c) In 2010, the estimated cost of hospital and emergency department care for firearm-related injuries in California was one hundred twelve million dollars ($112,000,000), with Medi-Cal and other government payers responsible for 64 percent of those costs. These high costs occur even though most people who die from firearm-related injuries do so at the scene of the shooting and receive no medical care for their injuries.

(d) Medical costs are only a small proportion (approximately 2 percent) of total societal costs, which are driven primarily by losses in productivity and quality of life.

(e) Medical and mental health care providers are uniquely positioned to help prevent all forms of firearm-related harm. Through the course of their regular patient care, they have opportunities to identify people at risk for such harm, provide evidence-based counseling on risk reduction, and intervene in situations of imminent risk.

(f) On October 30, 2018, the American College of Physicians published an updated position paper with recommendations for reducing firearm injuries and deaths in the United States that “recommends a public health approach to firearms-related violence and the prevention of firearm injuries and deaths” and encourages physicians to “discuss with their patients the risks that may be associated with having a firearm in the home and recommend ways to
 mitigate such risks.”

(g) Other organizations that have published statements identifying firearm-related harm as a health problem and recommending that medical and mental health professionals engage in efforts to prevent firearm-related harm as an element of their professional practice include the American Medical Association, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American College of Emergency Physicians, the American College of Surgeons, and the American Association of Suicidology.

(h) While many medical and mental health care providers recognize their responsibility to help prevent firearm-related injury and death, many cite lack of knowledge regarding when and how to counsel patients as a principal barrier to action. A position statement
 adopted by the California Medical Association Board of Trustees on July 28, 2017, states that “expanded education and training are needed to improve clinician familiarity with the benefits and risks of firearm ownership, safety practices, and communication with patients about firearm violence.” The position statement further states that “medical schools and residency programs should incorporate firearm violence prevention into their academic curricula” and “California-specific resources such as continuing medical education modules, toolkits, patient education handouts, and clinical intervention information would help to address this practice gap.” 

(i) Having assembled a team of experts in firearm-related death and injury, and specifically in provider and patient education to prevent firearm-related harm, the University of California Firearm Violence
 Research Center at UC Davis is uniquely qualified to research, develop, implement, and evaluate education and training programs for medical and mental health care providers on preventing firearm-related death and injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   (AB 521)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14236.

(a) The California Firearm Violence Research Center at UC Davis shall develop multifaceted education and training programs for medical and mental health providers on the prevention of firearm-related injury and death.

(b) The center shall develop education and training programs that address all of the following:

(1) The epidemiology of firearm-related injury and death, including the scope of the problem in California and nationwide, individual and societal determinants of risk, and effective prevention strategies for all types of firearm-related injury and death, including suicide, homicide, and unintentional injury and death.

(2) The role of health care providers in preventing firearm-related harm, including how to assess individual patients for risk of
 firearm-related injury and death.

(3) Best practices for conversations about firearm ownership, access, and storage.

(4) Appropriate tools for practitioner intervention with patients at risk for firearm-related injury or death, including, but not limited to, education on safer storage practices, gun violence restraining orders, and mental health interventions.

(5) Relevant laws and policies related to prevention of firearm-related injury and death and to the role of health care providers in preventing firearm-related harm.

(c) The center shall launch a comprehensive dissemination program to promote participation in these education and training programs among practicing physicians, mental health care professionals, physician assistants, nurse
 practitioners, nurses, health professional students, and other relevant professional groups in the state.

(d) The center shall develop curricular materials for medical and mental health care practitioners in practice and in training, tailored to the profession and suitable for use through a variety of methods. Educators from the center shall provide didactic education in person and by remote link at medical education institutions, and recruit and train additional health professionals to provide such education.

(e) The center shall develop education and training resources on firearm-related injury and death, including but not limited to, continuing medical education videos, additional training modules, a website with current information on relevant research and legislation, and handouts and written materials for clinicians to provide to patients. The center shall serve as a
 resource for the many professional and educational organizations in the state whose members seek to advance their knowledge of firearm-related injury and death and effective prevention measures.

(f) The center shall conduct rigorous research to further identify specific gaps in knowledge and structural barriers that prevent counseling and other interventions, and to evaluate the education and training program. The center shall incorporate the research findings into the design and implementation of the program to support the mission of the center to deliver content to health care providers and patients that is effective in guiding clinical decisions and reducing firearm-related injury and death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 253, Sec. 7.   (AB 173)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14237.

On or before December 31, 2020, and annually thereafter, the University of California shall transmit programmatic and financial reports on this program to the Legislature, including reporting on funding and expenditures by source, participation data, program accomplishments, and the future direction of the program. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   (AB 521)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14238.

This chapter shall apply to the University of California only to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, make any of these provisions applicable to the university.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 728, Sec. 3.   (AB 521)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Research by Other Institutions [14240. - 14240.]

14240.

(a) The Department of Justice shall establish procedures to implement subdivision (t) of Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code to provide materials relating to individuals for research related to firearm violence. These procedures shall include, but not be limited to, requests for data and timely review of requests. At the department’s discretion, the information may be provided to any nonprofit bona fide research institution accredited by the United States Department of Education or the Council for Higher Education Accreditation for the purpose of studying the prevention of violence, following approval by the institution’s governing institutional review board or human subjects committee, when required.

(b) Material identifying individuals
 shall only be provided for research or statistical activities and shall not be revealed or used for purposes other than research or statistical activities. Reports or publications derived therefrom shall not identify specific individuals. Reasonable costs to the department associated with the department’s processing of the data may be billed to the researcher. If a request for data or letter of support for research using the data is denied, the department shall provide a written statement of the specific reasons for the denial.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 253, Sec. 8.   (AB 173)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 12.3. GUN VIOLENCE PREVENTION [14245. - 14245.]

14245.

(a) There is hereby established within the Department of Justice the Office of Gun Violence Prevention.

(b) The office shall advise the Attorney General on gun violence prevention-related matters, serve as a liaison to gun violence prevention stakeholders, and support the implementation, coordination, and effectiveness of gun violence prevention laws and programs through activities, including those described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 36005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and through data and policy reports that highlight best practices, identify policy gaps and barriers to success, and make recommendations to the Legislature and other stakeholders about strategies, policies, and priorities for preventing gun violence.

(c) On or before July 1, 2026, the office shall issue a public report outlining the new legislation, improvements to statutory implementation, and increased programmatic funding necessary to achieve sustained reductions in gun violence in California.

(d) In the process of preparing the report, the office shall solicit input from recognized outside experts and stakeholders, including, but not limited to, local and state elected officials, law enforcement, gun violence prevention advocates, and academic researchers. The report shall include all of the following:

(1) Ascertaining gaps in firearm tracing systems and making recommendations to alleviate them.

(2) Making recommendations to implement and improve permitting and licensing and registration frameworks to
 limit unsafe firearm access.

(3) Examining and proposing policies to curb or eliminate irresponsible firearm industry practices, including in the distribution, retail sale, inventory, and marketing of firearms.

(4) Identifying
 gaps and barriers to success, and highlighting and proposing strategies to replicate best practices.

(5) Evaluating and identifying
 coordination and strategic planning across different state and local agencies.

(6) Best practice recommendations for improving implementation and coordination in court, law enforcement, health care, and crime victim system responses to gun violence.

(7) A five-year strategic plan for reducing gun violence in California.

(e) Within 60 days of completing the report, the office shall make the report publicly available and transmit copies to the Governor’s office and the public safety committees of both houses of the Legislature. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 529, Sec. 1.   (AB 1252)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 12.5. DNA [14250. - 14251.]

14250.

(a) (1) The Department of Justice shall develop a DNA database for all cases involving the report of an unidentified deceased person or a high-risk missing person.

(2) The database required in paragraph (1) shall be comprised of DNA data from genetic markers that are appropriate for human identification, but have no capability to predict biological function other than gender. These markers shall be selected by the department and may change as the technology for DNA typing progresses. The results of DNA typing shall be compatible with and uploaded into the CODIS DNA database established by the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The sole purpose of this database shall be to identify missing persons and shall
 be kept separate from the database established under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 295) of Title 9 of Part 1.

(3) The Department of Justice shall compare DNA samples taken from the remains of unidentified deceased persons with DNA samples taken from personal articles belonging to the missing person, or from the parents or appropriate relatives of high-risk missing persons.

(4) For the purpose of this database, “high-risk missing person” means a person missing as a result of a stranger abduction, a person missing under suspicious circumstances, a person missing under unknown circumstances, or where there is reason to assume that the person is in danger, or deceased, and that person has been missing more than 30 days, or less than 30 days in the discretion of the investigating agency.

(b) The department shall
 develop standards and guidelines for the preservation and storage of DNA samples. Any agency that is required to collect samples from unidentified remains for DNA testing shall follow these standards and guidelines. These guidelines shall address all scientific methods used for the identification of remains, including DNA, anthropology, odontology, and fingerprints.

(c) (1) A coroner shall collect samples for DNA testing from the remains of all unidentified persons and shall send those samples to the Department of Justice for DNA testing and inclusion in the DNA databank. After the department has taken a sample from the remains for DNA analysis and completed all DNA testing, the remaining evidence shall be returned to the appropriate local coroner.

(2) After a report has been made of a person missing under high-risk circumstances, the responsible
 investigating law enforcement agency shall inform the parents or other appropriate relatives that they may give a voluntary sample for DNA testing or may collect a DNA sample from a personal article belonging to the missing person if available. The samples shall be taken by the appropriate law enforcement agency in a manner prescribed by the Department of Justice. The responsible investigating law enforcement agency shall wait no longer than 30 days after a report has been made to inform the parents or other relatives of their right to give a sample.

(3) The Department of Justice shall develop a standard release form that authorizes a mother, father, or other relative to voluntarily provide the sample. The release shall explain that DNA is to be used only for the purpose of identifying the missing person and that the DNA sample and profile will be destroyed upon request. No incentive or coercion shall be used to compel a parent or relative to
 provide a sample.

(4) The Department of Justice shall develop a model kit that law enforcement shall use when taking samples from parents and relatives.

(5) Before submitting the sample to the department for analysis, law enforcement shall reverify the status of the missing person. After 30 days has elapsed from the date the report was filed, law enforcement shall send the sample to the department for DNA testing and inclusion in the DNA database, with a copy of the crime report, and any supplemental information.

(6) All retained samples and DNA extracted from a living person, and profiles developed therefrom, shall be used solely for the purpose of identification of the deceased’s remains. All samples and DNA extracted from a living person, and profiles developed therefrom, shall be destroyed after a positive
 identification with the deceased’s remains is made and a report is issued, unless any of the following has occurred:

(A) The coroner has made a report to a law enforcement agency pursuant to Section 27491.1 of the Government Code, that he or she has a reasonable ground to suspect that the identified person’s death has been occasioned by another by criminal means.

(B) A law enforcement agency makes a determination that the identified person’s death has been occasioned by another by criminal means.

(C) The evidence is needed in an active criminal investigation to determine whether the identified person’s death has been occasioned by another by criminal means.

(D) A governmental entity is required to retain the material pursuant to Section 1417.9.

(7) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, upon the request of any living person who submits his or her DNA sample and profile pursuant to this section, including the parent or guardian of a child who submits a DNA sample of the child, the DNA sample shall be removed from the DNA database.

(d) All DNA samples and profiles developed therefrom shall be confidential and shall only be disclosed to personnel of the Department of Justice, law enforcement officers, coroners, medical examiners, district attorneys, and persons who need access to a DNA sample for purposes of the prosecution or defense of a criminal case, except that a law enforcement officer or agency may publicly disclose the fact of a DNA profile match after taking reasonable measures to first notify the family of an unidentified deceased person or the family of a high-risk missing person that there has been
 an identification.

(e) All DNA, forensic identification profiles, and other identification information retained by the Department of Justice pursuant to this section are exempt from any law requiring disclosure of information to the public.

(f) (1) Any person who knowingly discloses DNA or other forensic identification information developed pursuant to this section to an unauthorized individual or agency, or for any purpose other than for identification or for use in a criminal investigation, prosecution, or defense, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A person who collects, processes, or stores DNA or DNA samples from a living person that are used for DNA testing pursuant to this section who does either of the following is liable in civil damages to the donor of the DNA in the amount of five
 thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, plus attorney’s fees and costs:

(A) Fails to destroy samples or DNA extracted from a living person pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c).

(B) Discloses DNA samples in violation of subdivision (d).

(g) (1) If a disclosure or failure to destroy samples described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) is made by an employee of the Department of Justice, the department shall be liable for those actions of its employee.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the remedy in this section shall be the sole and exclusive remedy against the department and its employees available to the donor of the DNA against the department and its employees.

(3) The department employee disclosing DNA or other forensic identification information or otherwise violating this section shall be absolutely immune from civil liability under this or any other law.

(h) It is not an unauthorized disclosure or violation of this section to release DNA and other forensic identification information as part of a judicial or administrative proceeding, to a jury or grand jury, or in a document filed with a court or administrative agency, or for this information to become part of the public transcript or record of proceedings.

(i) In order to maintain computer system security, the computer software and database structures used by the DNA laboratory of the Department of Justice to implement this chapter are confidential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.   (AB 275)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14251.

(a) The “Missing Persons DNA Database” shall be funded by a two dollar ($2) fee increase on death certificates issued by a local governmental agency or by the State of California. The issuing agencies may retain up to 5 percent of the funds from the fee increase for administrative costs.

(b) Funds shall be directed on a quarterly basis to the “Missing Persons DNA Data Base Fund,” hereby established, to be administered by the department for establishing and maintaining laboratory infrastructure, DNA sample storage, DNA analysis, and labor costs for cases of missing persons and unidentified remains. Funds may also be distributed by the department to various counties for the purposes of pathology and exhumation consistent with
 this title. The department may also use those funds to publicize the database for the purpose of contacting parents and relatives so that they may provide a DNA sample for training law enforcement officials about the database and DNA sampling and for outreach.

(c) The identification of any backlog of human remain samples or samples donated by a family member or from a personal article belonging to the missing person may be outsourced to other laboratories at the department’s discretion.

(d) (1) The Department of Justice shall retain the authority to prioritize case analysis, giving priority to those cases involving children and those involving homicide victims.

(2) If federal funding is made available, it shall be used to assist in the identification of the backlog of high-risk missing person
 cases and long-term unidentified remains.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 228, Sec. 2.   (AB 275)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 13. LOCAL ENVIRONMENTAL ENFORCEMENT AND TRAINING PROGRAMS [14300. - 14315.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [14300. - 14303.]

14300.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The enforcement of California’s environmental laws is essential to protect human health, the environment, and the state’s economy.

(2) Fair and uniform enforcement of laws and regulations governing the environment benefits law abiding businesses, firms, and individuals.

(3) There is a need to better integrate enforcement of environmental laws into California’s established criminal justice system.

(4) Local and state enforcement agencies can play an increasingly
 important role in protecting human health, the environment, and the state’s economy through greater involvement in the enforcement of environmental laws.

(5) Community-based organizations play a critical role in ensuring that disadvantaged communities, low-income residents, and other populations that are disproportionately burdened by pollution receive the benefit of enforcement of the state’s environmental laws and therefore need access to training and resources.

(6) Enforcing
 environmental laws often requires special training to detect violations, understand complex laws, and prepare and present complicated enforcement cases.

(7) There is a need to support programs that assist local and state enforcement officials in enforcing environmental laws through the training of peace officers, investigators, firefighters, public prosecutors,
 city and county counsel, and state and local environmental regulators.

(8) Fair and uniform enforcement of environmental laws is multidisciplinary and involves law enforcement, fire departments, state and local environmental regulators, the offices of local and state public prosecutors, community-based and nonprofit organizations, and law schools.

(b) For purposes of this title, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Account” means the Environmental Enforcement and Training Account created pursuant to Section 14303.

(2) “Commission” means the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(3) “Community-based organization” means an organization that engages directly and regularly with residents of identified communities or neighborhoods or that works to enforce environmental laws on behalf of disadvantaged communities, low-income residents, and other populations that are disproportionately burdened by pollution.

(4) “Agency” means the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(5) “Secretary” means the Agency Secretary for the California Environmental Protection Agency or
 their designee.

(6) “Environmental laws” means local, state, and federal environmental laws and regulations that impact public health and the environment, including, but not limited to, those that regulate toxic and carcinogenic materials, water quality, air quality, climate change, waste management, pesticides,
 noise, vibration, odors, and wildlife resources.

(7) “Public prosecutor” means district attorneys, city attorneys, city prosecutors, county counsels, and the Attorney General and their deputies.

(8) “Environmental regulator” means an employee of any state or local agency whose jurisdiction includes implementation, enforcement, or both implementation and enforcement of environmental laws.

(9) “Environmental enforcement” means the enforcement of environmental laws.

(c) This title shall be known and may be cited as the Environmental Enforcement and Training Act of 2002.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds to implement this title, as specified in Section 14314, come from public and private contributions,
 from the proceeds of property seized and forfeited as set forth in Section 11489 of the Health and Safety Code,
 and from the proceeds from any contributed state or federal court judgments, and that no funds be expended from the General Fund, other than from the Environmental Enforcement and Training Account, or other funds appropriated to, or authorized for expenditure by, the agency, to implement this title. It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds to implement this title shall be expended only from the account. It is the intent of the Legislature that funding provided from the account shall supplement, not supplant existing funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 83, Sec. 5.   (SB 157)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.

(a) There is hereby established in the agency, a program of financial assistance to do all of the following:

(1) Provide for statewide education and training programs in the enforcement of environmental laws for peace officers, investigators, state and local environmental regulators, public prosecutors, and community-based organizations.

(2) Establish enhanced local
 environmental enforcement efforts.

(3) Provide that disadvantaged communities, low-income residents, and other populations that are disproportionately burdened by pollution receive the benefit of enforcement of local, state, and federal environmental laws.

(4) All funds made available to the agency for the purposes of this title shall be administered and distributed by the secretary.

(b) Not later than 12 months after the date when this title may be implemented, as specified in Section 14314, the secretary shall prepare and issue regulations, which shall, at a minimum, describe how grants are to be allocated or awarded pursuant to this title, the procedures for applying for these grants, the criteria to be used in determining which applications will be funded, and the administrative and fiscal requirements governing the receipt and expenditure of these
 grants.

(c) The secretary shall
 periodically, and at least annually, subject to a sufficient balance in the Environmental Enforcement and Training Account, issue requests for proposals for the allocation and award of funds to public agencies or private nonprofit
 organizations, except for the California District Attorneys Association, for purposes of supporting environmental enforcement education and training programs for staff of community-based nonprofit organizations, peace officers, investigators, state and local environmental regulators, and public prosecutors pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 14304) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14306), which meet the criteria established pursuant to those chapters, and staff of community-based nonprofit organizations. To ensure that these programs are coordinated
 with existing peace officer training, the commission shall be consulted prior to the allocation of funds to peace officer education and training programs.
 The environmental enforcement education and training programs will be made available to staff of qualifying community-based nonprofit organizations on a no-cost basis.

(d) The secretary shall allocate and award funds to support the Environmental Circuit Prosecutor Grant Program pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 14309) for the purpose of improving enforcement of environmental laws by enhancing the investigation and prosecution of violations of those laws.

(e) The secretary shall post notices of awards issued and grantee reports received on a
 designated public internet webpage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 83, Sec. 6.   (SB 157)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14303.

(a) There is hereby created, in the General Fund, the Environmental Enforcement and Training Account and up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) in the account may be expended annually by the agency, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this title.

(b) The agency may accept and receive any contribution of funds from a public or private organization or an individual, including the proceeds from a judgment in state or federal court, when the funds are contributed or the judgment specifies that the proceeds are to be used to carry out the purposes of this title. Private contributors shall not have the authority to further influence or direct the use of their
 contributions.

(c) The agency shall immediately deposit any funds contributed pursuant to subdivision (b) in the account.

(d) As of January 1, 2003, all unallocated funds in the Hazardous Materials Enforcement and Training Account created pursuant to Chapter 743 of the Statutes of 1992 that derive from court judgments specifying that the funds may be used only for purposes of this title shall be transferred to the Environmental Enforcement and Training Account.

(e) (1) Any funds that are appropriated by the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a), allocated pursuant to Section 14314, and declined by the commission, shall be reallocated by the secretary as described in Section 14314.

(2) This subdivision applies to funds that are
 appropriated for the 2011–12 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 304, Sec. 12.   (SB 428)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Peace Officer  Environmental Enforcement Training [14304. - 14304.]

14304.

(a) The commission shall develop or review and certify, not later than 12 months after the date when this title may be implemented, as specified in Section 14314, a course or courses of instruction for training local and state peace officers in the detection of violations, and in the apprehension of suspected violators, of state and local environmental laws.

(b) The course or courses of instruction shall, at a minimum, include training on all of the following:

(1) Understanding environmental laws.

(2) Detecting violations of environmental laws.

(3) Knowing steps to take when violations are discovered in order to protect public health and facilitate prosecution of violators.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1000, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Environmental Training And Enforcement [14306. - 14308.]

14306.

(a) The secretary shall provide funding to qualified grantees to develop and implement, not later than 12 months after the receipt of funds, a course or courses of instruction for the training of staff of community-based nonprofit organizations, public prosecutors, or staff of community-based nonprofit organizations and public prosecutors in the enforcement of state and local environmental laws.

(b) The course or courses of instruction shall, at a minimum, do
 one or more of the following:

(1) Provide an understanding of the requirements of environmental laws.

(2) Teach prosecution techniques that will facilitate prosecution of environmental law violations.

(c) The secretary shall not award a grant to, or enter into a contract with, the California District Attorneys Association for development and implementation of courses of instruction pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 32.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14307.

(a) The secretary shall provide funding to qualified grantees to develop and implement, not later than 12 months after the receipt of funds, a course or courses of instruction for the training of staff of community-based nonprofit organizations, or public prosecutors, fire departments, and state and local environmental regulators, or staff of community-based nonprofit organizations, public prosecutors, fire departments, and state and local environmental regulators.

(b) With the concurrence of the commission, peace officers may participate in the course or courses of training.

(c) The course or courses of instruction shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Provide an understanding of the requirements of environmental laws.

(2) Teach enforcement investigative techniques that will facilitate the prosecution of environmental law violations.

(3) Provide environmental enforcement training materials.

(d) The secretary shall not award a grant to, or enter into a contract with, the California District Attorneys Association for development and implementation of courses of instruction
 pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 33.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14308.

(a) The secretary may award grants to public and private entities for training public prosecutors, peace officers, firefighters, community-based nonprofit organizations, and state or local environmental regulators in the investigation and enforcement of environmental laws.

(b) The secretary may award local assistance grants as follows for the enforcement of environmental
 laws:

(1) To local environmental regulators.

(2) To community-based nonprofit organizations.

(3) To local environmental regulators jointly with community-based nonprofit organizations.

(c) The secretary may allow local environmental regulators to subgrant funding to community-based nonprofit organizations.

(d) Grant funding awarded to community-based nonprofit organizations either directly by the secretary or through a subgrant pursuant to this section may be used to address environmental violations that occur in or disproportionately impact disadvantaged
 communities, to support the inclusion of residents of disadvantaged communities in environmental enforcement efforts, for the identification and investigation of environmental violations, and for the development and litigation of environmental enforcement cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 34.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Environmental Circuit Prosecutor Project [14309. - 14309.]

14309.

(a) The Environmental Circuit Prosecutor Grant Program is hereby established within the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(b) The Environmental Circuit Prosecutor
 Grant Program shall have the following purposes:

(1) Discourage the commission of violations of environmental laws by demonstrating the effective response of the criminal justice system to these violations, including, but not limited to, assisting district attorneys, particularly in rural counties, in the prosecution of criminal violations of environmental laws and regulations, where a district attorney has requested assistance.

(2) Establish model environmental crime prevention, enforcement, and prosecution techniques with statewide application for fair, uniform, and effective application.

(3) Increase the awareness and effectiveness of efforts to enforce environmental laws and to better integrate environmental prosecution into California’s established criminal justice
 system by providing on the job education and training to local peace officers and prosecutors and to local and state environmental regulators.

(4) Promote, through uniform and effective prosecution and local assistance, the effective enforcement of environmental laws and regulations.

(c) (1) The award of funds pursuant to this section may only be used to fund the costs of prosecutors, investigators, and research attorney staff, including salary, benefits, and expenses. The prosecutors, investigators, and research attorney staff may be either employees of a private nonprofit organization composed of local prosecutors, other
 than the California District Attorneys Association, or employees from local, state, or federal governmental agencies.

(2) The agency shall not award a grant to, or enter into a contract with, the California District Attorneys Association for the purpose of operating the Environmental Circuit Prosecutor Grant Program.

(d) (1) A district attorney may request
 funding from the Environmental Circuit Prosecutor
 Grant Program to fund a prosecutor, investigator, or research attorney who would be available in that county or another county for any of the following purposes:

(A) Assistance with the investigation and development of environmental cases.

(B) Consultation concerning whether an environmental case merits filing.

(C) Litigation support, including, but not limited to, the actual prosecution of the case. A district attorney shall, as appropriate, deputize a circuit prosecutor to prosecute cases within
 their jurisdiction.

(2) The authority of a deputized circuit prosecutor shall be consistent with and shall not exceed the authority of the elected district attorney or
 their deputies.

(3) Violations of city or county ordinances may be prosecuted by circuit prosecutors when there is an environmental nexus between the ordinance and a violation of state law, federal law, or both state and federal law.

(4) Participating district attorney offices shall provide matching funds or in-kind contributions equivalent to, but not less than, 20 percent of the expense of the deputized environmental circuit prosecutor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 83, Sec. 9.   (SB 157)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Implementation and Funding Priorities [14314. - 14315.]

14314.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the agency shall not implement this title until there is an amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in the account.

Funds in the account shall be divided as follows:

(a) Twenty-five percent or one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to the commission, whichever is less. The commission may decline all or part of the funds allocated to it pursuant to this subdivision. Any funds so declined shall be reallocated by the secretary to any of the entities listed in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) for the training of peace officers consistent with this title.

(b) (1) The balance to the secretary for grants awarded to programs pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14306) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 14309) based on need or in order to sustain the current level of presence and enforcement for those programs.
